Utah statutes.
17B-2a-813.   Rights, benefits, and protective conditions for employees of a
public transit district -- Strike prohibited -- Employees of an acquired
transit system.
(1)  The rights, benefits, and other employee protective conditions and
remedies of Section 13(c) of the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964, 49
U.S.C. Sec. 5333(b), as determined by the Secretary of Labor, apply to a
public transit district's establishment and operation of a public transit
service or system.
(2) (a)  Employees of a public transit system established and operated by a
public transit district have the right to:
(i)  self-organization;
(ii)  form, join, or assist labor organizations; and
(iii)  bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing.
(b)  Employees of a public transit district and labor organizations may not
join in a strike against the public transit system operated by the public
transit district.
(c)  Each public transit district shall:
(i)  recognize and bargain exclusively with any labor organization
representing a majority of the district's employees in an appropriate unit
with respect to wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, and welfare,
pension, and retirement provisions; and
(ii)  upon reaching agreement with the labor organization, enter into and
execute a written contract incorporating the agreement.
(3)  If a public transit district acquires an existing public transit system:
(a)  all employees of the acquired system who are necessary for the operation
of the acquired system, except executive and administrative officers and
employees, shall be:
(i)  transferred to and appointed employees of the acquiring public transit
district; and
(ii)  given sick leave, seniority, vacation, and pension or retirement credits
in accordance with the acquired system's records;
(b)  members and beneficiaries of a pension or retirement plan or other
program of benefits that the acquired system has established shall continue to
have rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to
that established plan or program; and
(c)  the public transit district may establish, amend, or modify, by agreement
with employees or their authorized representatives, the terms, conditions, and
provisions of a pension or retirement plan or of an amendment or modification
of a pension or retirement plan.
